Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1 General Provisions
Blocks (060200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 2025 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2051 2052 2055 2057 2085

VTD: 05-1 William James Middle

Blocks (060300): 1020 1023 1024 1025

VTD: 07-1 Pomona Baptist Church

Blocks (060601): 2070 2071 2072 2076

Blocks (060602): 1041 1043 3035 3036 3042 3043 3044 3045 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4038 4039 4040 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4052 4053 4054 4055Blocks (060700): 2089 2090 2100 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2150 2154 2156

VTD: 08-1 Walnut Street Church

VTD: 09-1 Superintendent's Office

VTD: 10-1 Dickson Middle School

Blocks (060501): 4000 4001 4012 4013 4015

Hickman County

Maury County

VTD: Armory

Blocks (010802): 1110 1112 1113 1116 1117 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1135 1139 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1146 1154 1155

VTD: Baker

VTD: Bear Creek

Blocks (010500): 3081

VTD: College Hill

VTD: Hampshire

Blocks (010100): 3085 3109 3110 3111 3148 3149 3151 3152 3153

Blocks (010900): 1036 1128 1129 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2101 2104 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2137 2138 2139 2144 2145 2146

VTD: Highland

Blocks (010600): 4038 4039 4043

Blocks (010700): 4002 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011

VTD: St. Catherine

Blocks (010100): 3102 3112 3113 3150

Blocks (010802): 1088 1089 1090 1091 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1114 1115 1145 1147 1148 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2021 2022 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2042 2043 2044 2045 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2078 2079 2080 2088 2095 2096 2099 2102 2103

Blocks (010900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1083 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1130 1131 1132 1133

VTD: Tradewinds

Blocks (010700): 1002 1003 1005 2002 2005

VTD: West End

District 70:

Giles County

Lawrence County

VTD: 10-1 Howards

VTD: 10-2 Brace

VTD: 1-1 St. Joseph

VTD: 1-2 West Loretto

VTD: 13-2 Midwest

VTD: 13-3 Pea Ridge

VTD: 14-1 Crawfish Valley

VTD: 15-1 David Crocket

VTD: 16-1 Rotary Park

VTD: 17-1 Sowell

VTD: 17-2 Old Armory

VTD: 18-1 E. O. Coffman

VTD: 2-1 Loretto Civic Center

VTD: 3-1 South East Lawrence

VTD: 3-2 Centerpoint

VTD: 4-1 Crossroads

VTD: 4-2 Fall River

VTD: 5-1 Leoma

VTD: 5-2 Gandy

VTD: 6-1 Iron City

VTD: 6-2 West Point

VTD: 7-1 Lawrenceburg Public

VTD: 8-1 New Prospect

VTD: 9-1 Ethridge

VTD: 9-2 Mars Hill

District 71:

Hardin County

Lawrence County

VTD: 11-1 Summertown

VTD: 12-1 Center

VTD: 12-2 Henryville

VTD: 13-1 West End

Lewis County

Wayne County

District 72:

Chester County

Decatur County

Henderson County

Perry County

District 73:

Madison County

VTD: 10-1 Spring Creek Fire Station #7

VTD: 10-2 Northeast Middle School

VTD: 10-3 Northside High School

VTD: 1-2 Washington Douglas Headstart School

Blocks (001402): 2022 2028 2029 2030 2032 2033 2034 2035 2041

VTD: 2-2 Aldersgate United Methodist Church

VTD: 3-2 Old Bells Road Fire Station #10

VTD: 3-3 Jackson Center for Independent Living

VTD: 4-1 Jackson Masonic Temple Lodge #45

VTD: 4-3 Festivities! Events and Party Place

VTD: 5-1 Whitehall Elementary School

Blocks (001402): 1033 1034 2016 2018 2019 2020 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2075

VTD: 5-3 North Parkway Elementary School

Blocks (000100): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3033

Blocks (001402): 1012 1013 1015 1016 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049

VTD: 6-1 Southside High School

Blocks (000300): 1028 1032 1034 1045 1046 1048

Blocks (001300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1012 1015 1021 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1049 2005 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2061 2063 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3081 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 3088 3089 3090 3091 3092 3093 3094 3095 3096 3097 3098 3099 3100 3101 3102 3103 3104 3105 3106 3107 3108 3109 3110 3111 3114 3115 3116

Blocks (001900): 4027 4028 4030

VTD: 6-2 South Elementary School

VTD: 6-3 Lesters Chapel Fire Station #1

VTD: 6-4 Malesus Community Center

Blocks (001300): 1009 1010 1011 1013 1014 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1022 1023 1024 1025 1048 1050 1051 1052 1053 3035

Blocks (001401): 1009 1010 1011 1012

Blocks (001800): 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1024 1095

Blocks (001900): 4013 4014 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4029

VTD: 6-5 Medon City Hall

Blocks (001800): 1008 1009 1010 1012 1013 1023 1025 1027 1028 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092

VTD: 7-1 UT Experiment Station

Blocks (000200): 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2025

Blocks (000300): 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1035 1036 1037 1049 1050

Blocks (001401): 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2017 2018 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2050 2051 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2082 2083

VTD: 7-2 Tennessee Technology Center

Blocks (001401): 2000 2001 2014 2015 2016 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2048 2049 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2065 2066 2072 2080

Blocks (001700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1095 1096 1097 1103 1104 2016 2018 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2038

VTD: 7-3 Denmark-West Community Center

Blocks (001700): 2025 2036 2037 2042 2043

VTD: 8-1 Beech Bluff Ruritan Club

VTD: 8-2 Brown's Community Ruritan Club

VTD: 8-3 Mifflin Fire Station #15

VTD: 8-4 East Union Ruritan Club

VTD: 9-1 V.F.W.

VTD: 9-2 Pope Elementary School

VTD: 9-3 Three Way City Meeting Room

District 74:

Houston County

Humphreys County

Montgomery County

VTD: 10

VTD: 11

Blocks (101102): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 3000 3001 3002 3003 3005 3021

Blocks (101103): 1019 1028 1029 1030 1031 1033

Blocks (101201): 1006 1010 1011

Blocks (101202): 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1020

Blocks (101500): 2048 4000 4001 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4011

VTD: 15

Blocks (101102): 3004 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3019 3020 3022 3023 3024

VTD: 16

Blocks (101101): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1018

VTD: 4B

Blocks (101700): 1064 1065 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1087

VTD: 6B

Blocks (101700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1060 1061 1062 1063 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1084 1085 1086 1088 1089 1091 1092 2004 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2049 2050 2051 2071 2072

VTD: 7

VTD: 8

VTD: 9

Blocks (101304): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3025 3026 3027 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033

Blocks (101305): 1003 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1019

Blocks (101400): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3063 3064

District 75:

Benton County

Henry County

Stewart County

District 76:

Carroll County

VTD: 02 Trezevant

VTD: 03 Christmasville

VTD: 07 Macedonia

VTD: 12 Bruceton

VTD: 13 Hollow Rock

VTD: 14 Vale

VTD: 17 Senior Citizens

VTD: 18 Cannon

VTD: 21 Bethel College-Waddle Hall

VTD: 22 McKenzie City Hall

Obion County

VTD: 1-1 South Fulton

VTD: 2-1 Eddie Cox Sr. Center

Blocks (965100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1017 1018 1019 1020 1023 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1110 1111 1112 1113 2059 2062 2064 2068 2073

Blocks (965500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1117 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2044 2045 2046 2053 2146 2147 2148

Blocks (965600): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2024 2025 2026 2027 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 3013 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4023 4024 4025 4026 4032 4033 4034 4035

Blocks (965700): 1006 1007 1013

VTD: 3-4 Rives

Blocks (965000): 4062 4063 4082

Blocks (965100): 1114 1115 1116

Blocks (965600): 1044 1064

Blocks (965800): 1000 1002 1003 1004 1006

VTD: 4-1 Fair Grounds

Weakley County

District 77:

Dyer County

Lake County

Obion County

VTD: 2-1 Eddie Cox Sr. Center

Blocks (965100): 2065 2066 2069 2070 2071 2072 2074

VTD: 2-4 Woodland

VTD: 3-2 Kenton

VTD: 3-4 Rives

Blocks (965200): 2019 2020 2023 2024 2025 2026

Blocks (965400): 1000 1001 1006 1007

Blocks (965500): 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2116 2117 2118 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2139 2140 2141 2142 2143 2144 2145 2149 2150 2151 2152 2153

Blocks (965600): 1057 1063

Blocks (965700): 2011 2012 2037 2038 2041 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 3000 3001 3002 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3015 3016 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039

Blocks (965800): 1001 1005 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 2119 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130

Blocks (965900): 1000 2000 2003 2005

VTD: 5-2 Cloverdale

VTD: 5-4 Hornbeak

VTD: 5-5 Samburg

VTD: 6-1 Troy Senior Center

VTD: 6-2 Obion

VTD: 7-2 Obion Co. Library

District 78:

Cheatham County

Dickson County

VTD: 02-1 Eno Methodist

Blocks (060700): 2127

VTD: 04-1 Jackson Chapel C.C.

Blocks (060200): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2050 2053 2054 2056 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091

Blocks (060300): 1012 1013 1014 1015

VTD: 05-1 William James Middle

Blocks (060300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1016 1017 1018 1019 1021 1022 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2083 2084 2094 2095 2101 2105 2106

VTD: 06-1 Burns Town Hall

VTD: 06-2 Porter C.C.

VTD: 07-1 Pomona Baptist Church

Blocks (060402): 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1079 1080 1081 1082 2065 2066 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2120 2121 2122 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134

Blocks (060602): 1054 1055 1056 1057 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4037 4041 4042 4043 4044 4050 4051 4056 4057

Blocks (060700): 2111 2113 2125 2126 2128 2129

VTD: 10-1 Dickson Middle School

Blocks (060501): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2033 2034 2035 2038 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2055 2056 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4014 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053 4054 4055 4056 4057 4058 4059 4060 4061 4062 4063 4064 4065 4066 4067 4068 4069 4070 4071 4072 4073 4074 4075 4076 4077 4078 4079 4080 4081 4082 4083 4084 4085 4086 4087 4088 4089 4090 4091 4092 4093 4094 4095 4096 4097 4098 4099 4100 4101 4102

VTD: 11-1 New Hope Baptist Church

VTD: 12-1 Catfish Kitchen

VTD: 12-2 Eastside C.C.

VTD: 12-3 White Bluff C.C.

District 79:

Carroll County

VTD: 01 Lavinia

VTD: 04 McLemoresville

VTD: 05 Cedar Grove

VTD: 06 Clarksburg

VTD: 08 Civic Center

VTD: 09 Huntingdon City Hall

VTD: 10 Yuma

VTD: 11 Buena Vista

VTD: 15 Westview

VTD: 16 Atwood

VTD: 19 Concord

VTD: 20 Westport

Gibson County

District 80:

Hardeman County

VTD: Bolivar

VTD: Campbell Chapel

VTD: Grand Junction

Blocks (950600): 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1095 1096 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1105 1106 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1121 1123 1124 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1133 1136 1137 1138 1139 1140 1141 1142 1144 1152 1156 1157 1158 1161 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2180

VTD: Hickory Valley

VTD: Hornsby

VTD: Lacy

VTD: Middleton

Blocks (950500): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1074 1075 1085 1100 1101 1102 1118 1119 1120 1121 1133 1134 1135 2057 2124 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2139 2140 2141 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3024 3026 3027 3028 3031 3039 3048 3063 3064

VTD: Pocahontas

Blocks (950100): 3169 3170 3179

Blocks (950500): 2066 2069 2076 2078 2080 2087

VTD: Saulsbury

Blocks (950500): 1018 1019

Blocks (950600): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2060 2061 2066 2067 2068 2069 2071 2073 2074 2117 2119 2187 2188 2189 2190

VTD: Silerton

VTD: Toone

VTD: West Bolivar

VTD: Whiteville

Madison County

VTD: 1-1 Carl Perkins Civic Center

VTD: 1-2 Washington Douglas Headstart School

Blocks (000900): 1000 1001 1010 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 2009 2010 2021 2022 3020 3026 3027 3028 3029 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039

Blocks (001000): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016

Blocks (001100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1060 1061 1078 1079 1080 1083 1084

Blocks (001402): 2036 2037

VTD: 2-1 Alexander Elementary School

VTD: 2-3 Tigrett Middle School

VTD: 3-1 Board of Education

VTD: 4-2 Andrew Jackson Elementary School

VTD: 5-1 Whitehall Elementary School

Blocks (000500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026

Blocks (000800): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1033 1034 1035 1042

Blocks (000900): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1011 1012 1013 1014 1021 1022 1023 1024 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2023 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3030 3031 3032 3033 3040

VTD: 5-2 Macedonia Baptist Church

VTD: 5-3 North Parkway Elementary School

Blocks (000100): 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3032 3034 3035

VTD: 6-1 Southside High School

Blocks (000300): 1033 1047

Blocks (000800): 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2043 2044 2045 2046 2104 2105 2106 2120 2121 2125 2128 2129

Blocks (001300): 3005 3006

VTD: 6-4 Malesus Community Center

Blocks (001300): 3007

Blocks (001800): 1000 1001

VTD: 6-5 Medon City Hall

Blocks (001800): 1007 1011 1093 1094 2042 2043 2045 2046 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2124 2126 2127 2130

VTD: 7-1 UT Experiment Station

Blocks (000200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1014 2021 2022 2023 2024

Blocks (000300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1029 1030 1031 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044

VTD: 7-2 Tennessee Technology Center

Blocks (001401): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1013 1014 1015 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2081

Blocks (001700): 1093 1094 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1105 1106 2000 2001 2008 2014 2017 2019 2075 2076 2077 2078 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092

Blocks (001800): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004

VTD: 7-3 Denmark-West Community Center

Blocks (001700): 1107 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2015 2039 2040 2041 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2059 2060 2061 2072 2073

Blocks (001800): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1026 1029 1030 1031 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2025 2026 2028 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2129

VTD: 7-4 Mercer Fire Station #8

District 81:

Tipton County

District 82:

Crockett County

Haywood County

Lauderdale County

District 83:

Shelby County

VTD: Forest Hills 1

VTD: Forest Hills 2

Blocks (021520): 1038 1039 1040

VTD: Germantown 02

VTD: Germantown 03

Blocks (021351): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1007 1008 1009 1012 1013 1014 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019

VTD: Germantown 06

VTD: Germantown 09

VTD: Germantown 10

VTD: Memphis 56-1

VTD: Memphis 64

VTD: Memphis 68-1

VTD: Memphis 68-2

VTD: Memphis 68-3

VTD: Memphis 80-2

VTD: Memphis 81-1

VTD: Memphis 81-3

VTD: Memphis 81-4

VTD: Memphis 81-5

VTD: Memphis 81-6

Blocks (021320): 3000 3001

VTD: Memphis 81-7

Blocks (021331): 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1021 1022 1031 1032 1033 1034

Blocks (021333): 1003 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 2006 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027

Blocks (021334): 1008 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1028 1029 1031 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2021 2022 2026 2027

VTD: Memphis 89-2

Blocks (021122): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2015 2016 2017 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012

Blocks (021200): 1002 1003 1014

Blocks (980400): 1005 1007 1008 1009 1010 1017

District 84:

Shelby County

VTD: Capleville 1

VTD: Capleville 5

Blocks (022600): 1170 1171 1192 1194

VTD: Memphis 60-5

Blocks (011010): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016

Blocks (011020): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1022 1023 1024 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008

Blocks (022600): 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1054 1105 1106 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125

Blocks (980100): 1044 1050 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091

VTD: Memphis 60-7

VTD: Memphis 66

Blocks (009400): 1025 1026 1029 1030 1031 1032 1035

VTD: Memphis 67-1

Blocks (009500): 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023

VTD: Memphis 67-3

Blocks (009500): 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 3022 3023 3026 3027 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4033

VTD: Memphis 74-1

Blocks (009500): 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038

Blocks (021331): 3011 3012 3013 3014

Blocks (021710): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014

Blocks (021721): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1007 1008 1009 1010 1020

VTD: Memphis 74-4

VTD: Memphis 74-6

Blocks (009500): 4032

Blocks (021331): 3009 3010

VTD: Memphis 74-9

Blocks (022600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1055 1056 1057 1058 1060 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018

VTD: Memphis 79-8

Blocks (022112): 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 3013 3015

VTD: Memphis 81-2

Blocks (021331): 2017

VTD: Memphis 92-1

Blocks (010820): 1015 4000 4012 4013 4014 4015

Blocks (021721): 2003

Blocks (021731): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009

Blocks (022600): 2000 2019 2020 2021 2022 2031

VTD: Memphis 92-2

VTD: Memphis 93-1

Blocks (021721): 1006 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1021

VTD: Memphis 93-3

Blocks (010820): 1000 1013 1014 1016

Blocks (021721): 2000 2001 2002 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006

VTD: Memphis 94-2

VTD: Memphis 94-3

VTD: Memphis 94-5

Blocks (021746): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014

VTD: Memphis 94-7

VTD: Memphis 94-8

Blocks (021744): 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 3008 3009 3010 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010

Blocks (021745): 3006

VTD: Ross Store 01

Blocks (021754): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018

VTD: Ross Store 05

Blocks (021744): 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022

Blocks (021745): 1015 1017 1018 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 2020 2021 2022 2026 2027 2028 2029 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013

VTD: Ross Store 13

Blocks (021754): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029

VTD: Ross Store 16

Blocks (021751): 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1042 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033

District 85:

Shelby County

VTD: Capleville 5

Blocks (021900): 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4025 4026 4027

Blocks (022600): 1168 1169 1172 1174 1178 1179 1180 1181 1182 1183 1184 1185 1186 1187 1188 1189 1190 1191 1195 1196 1197 1205 1206 1207 1208 1209

VTD: Forest Hills 2

Blocks (021510): 1020 1030 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071

VTD: Memphis 56-3

Blocks (009400): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1016

Blocks (009500): 1000 1001

VTD: Memphis 66

Blocks (009400): 1013 1014 1015 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1023 1024

VTD: Memphis 67-1

Blocks (009500): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017

VTD: Memphis 67-3

Blocks (009500): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3024 3025 3028

VTD: Memphis 74-1

Blocks (021725): 3005 3006 3007

VTD: Memphis 74-6

Blocks (021331): 2011 2012 2013 3001 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3015

VTD: Memphis 75-11

Blocks (022330): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1010 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3015 3016 3017 3019

Blocks (022410): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2009 2010 2011 2012 2015

VTD: Memphis 75-5

Blocks (022410): 1012 3000 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012

VTD: Memphis 75-6

Blocks (022310): 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017

Blocks (022330): 1001 1002 1007 1008 1009 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3018

VTD: Memphis 75-7

Blocks (022310): 4006 4007 4008

VTD: Memphis 76-4

Blocks (022322): 4002 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017

VTD: Memphis 76-5

VTD: Memphis 76-6

Blocks (022700): 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3023 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4016 4017

VTD: Memphis 77-2

Blocks (022121): 3008 3009

Blocks (022700): 2002 2004 2011 2012

VTD: Memphis 79-2

Blocks (022121): 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023

VTD: Memphis 79-3

VTD: Memphis 81-2

Blocks (021331): 1004 1005 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2014 2015 2016 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 3000 3002 3003 3016 3017 3018

VTD: Memphis 81-6

Blocks (021320): 3008 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3026 3027

VTD: Memphis 81-7

Blocks (021331): 1003 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1019 1020 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030

VTD: Memphis 93-1

Blocks (021725): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3008 3009 3010

VTD: Memphis 93-2

VTD: Memphis 93-3

Blocks (021726): 1000 1001 1002 1003 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006

VTD: Memphis 94-5

Blocks (021746): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005

VTD: Memphis 94-8

Blocks (021744): 1000 1001 1002 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 2000 2001 2002 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007

VTD: Ross Store 01

Blocks (022600): 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1198 1199 1200 1201 1202 1212 1213 1214 1215 1216 1217 1218 1219 1220

VTD: Ross Store 05

Blocks (021342): 1056 1057 1058 1059 1062 1063 1065 1066 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081

Blocks (021744): 1003 1004

Blocks (021745): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1016 1019 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2023 2024 2025 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034

VTD: Ross Store 13

Blocks (021753): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013

VTD: Ross Store 14

VTD: Ross Store 16

Blocks (021751): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1023 1024 1025 1026 1041

District 86:

Shelby County

VTD: Bartlett 14

Blocks (020222): 1040

VTD: Locke

VTD: Lucy 1

VTD: Lucy 2

VTD: Lucy 3

VTD: McConnell's

VTD: Memphis 01

Blocks (000100): 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1040 1041 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066

Blocks (002100): 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081

Blocks (004200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1009 1010 1011 1012 1020

Blocks (011300): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1097

VTD: Memphis 02

Blocks (004200): 1008 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073

Blocks (004300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077

Blocks (011400): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1010 1011 1012 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 3007

VTD: Memphis 12

Blocks (004300): 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1053 1054 1055 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1078 1079

Blocks (011700): 1004 1017 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1085 1086 1089 1090 1139 1146

Blocks (980200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1022 1023 1025 1026 1027 1028

VTD: Memphis 22

VTD: Memphis 25-2

Blocks (005700): 2018

Blocks (005900): 1000 2033 2034

Blocks (011600): 2033 2037 2038

VTD: Memphis 26-1

Blocks (005900): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018

Blocks (006000): 1005 1006

Blocks (006200): 2002 2004 2005 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014

Blocks (006400): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1027 1028 1037

Blocks (011500): 1005 1006 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4032 4033 4034

VTD: Memphis 27

Blocks (011300): 1023

VTD: Memphis 31-1

Blocks (006400): 1007 1008 1009 1011 1012 1013 1033 1034 1035 1036 1041

VTD: Memphis 31-4

Blocks (006400): 1006 1015 1016 1017 1018 1023 1024 1025 1026 1029 1030 1031 1032 1038 1039 1040

VTD: Memphis 34-2

Blocks (005700): 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028

VTD: Memphis 35-1

Blocks (005500): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041

Blocks (005600): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026

VTD: Memphis 48

Blocks (006000): 1024 1025 1026 1027 1029 1030 1031

Blocks (011500): 4031

VTD: Memphis 49

Blocks (005600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1016 1017 1027 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3014 3057

Blocks (005700): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2029 2030 2031 2032

Blocks (006000): 1028

Blocks (007500): 2000

VTD: Memphis 50-1
